Maryland, session 2026, HB0556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–276.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DWELLING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–105 OF THIS
TITLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0556*

HOUSE BILL 556
(3) “ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO, DURING
THE TAXABLE YEAR, PAYS AT LEAST 25% OF HOUSEHOLD NET INCOME ON EXPENSES
FOR UTILITY SERVICES FOR THE INDIVIDUAL’S DWELLING.
(4) “NET INCOME” MEANS THE PART OF EARNINGS THAT REMAIN
AFTER DEDUCTION OF ANY AMOUNT REQUIRED TO BE WITHHELD BY LAW.
(5) “UTILITY SERVICE” MEANS ELECTRICITY, GAS, WATER, OR
INTERNET SERVICE.
(B) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY GRANT, BY LAW,
A TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX
IMPOSED ON AN ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL’S DWELLING LOCATED IN THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
(C) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY PROVIDE, BY
LAW, FOR:
(1) THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION;
(2) ADDITIONAL ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR THE TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS SECTION; AND
(3) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.